Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-110
City or village plat; vacation.

The county board shall have power to authorize the vacation of any city or village plat when the same is not within an incorporated city or village, on the petition of two-thirds of the owners thereof.

Laws 1879, § 23, p. 360;

Laws 1887, c. 26, § 1, p. 351;

Laws 1905, c. 44, § 1, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 952;

Laws 1915, c. 17, § 1, p. 74;

C.S.1922, § 852;

Laws 1925, c. 93, § 1, p. 274;

Laws 1929, c. 60, § 2, p. 232;

C.S.1929, § 26-105;

Laws 1931, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

Laws 1933, c. 36, § 1, p. 237;

Laws 1939, c. 28, § 5, p. 145;

Laws 1941, c. 48, § 2, p. 236;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-105;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 1(6), p. 225;

R.S.1943, § 23-110.